tools/hyphenators/sma_hyph.tex
.aa2
.aa1d1
.aaf1
.aak1
.aal1
.aat1
.ab1a
.ab1i
.ac1
.ac1e
.ac1i
.ad1
.ad1a
.ad1e1
.ad1i
.adj1
.adm1
.ael1
.aer1
.aev1
.af1
.ag1
.ais1
.akk1
.aks1
.ak2t1
.aku1
.al1
.al1b
.al1e
.al1i
.al2l
.alp1
.alv1
.ama1
.amb1
.an2
.and1
.ann1
.ant1
.ap1
.ap1a
.ar1e
.ark1
.as1a
.as1i
.asj2
.ast1
.at1
.at1a
.atj1
.au2
.au1e1
.aur1
.aut1
.av1a
.av1j
.aw1
.aå1t
.áb1
.áhk1
.áh1t
.áj1
.ája1
.ám1
.ára1
.árd1
.ás2
.áså1
.áta1
.átu1
.ba1l
.ba1s
.bat1
.bál1
.bbu1
.bd1e
.bd1j
.bem1
.be2s
.bet1
.bij1
.bin1
.bïl1
.bk1e
.boe1
.bog1
.bo1l1
.bri1
.bru1
.bus1
.bys1
.bæs1
.can1
.cer1
.ch2
.ci1
.cin1
.col1
.com1
.cre1
.čih1
.dab1
.dad1
.daj2
.da1l
.dat1
.de1a
.deb1
.de1h
.di2
.din1
.di2r
.dis1
.dit1
.dïj1
.dj1e1
.djo1
.do2
.dob1
.dod1
.dos1
.dov1
.dó1
.dri1
.dsa1
.dsi1
.dsu1
.du2
.dul1
.dup1
.dus1
.dvi1
.dø1
.dåe1
.dår1
.eai1
.eal1
.eb1
.eco1
.ee2
.eeg1
.eek1
.ee1n
.ef1
.efe1
.eg1
.ego1
.egå1
.eh1
.eit1
.ek1
.ell1
.elo1
.elu1
.elæ1
.em1
.em1a
.em1e
.emæ1
.eng1
.enn1
.en2t1
.ep1e
.epi1
.ere1
.er1i
.ero1
.ers2
.ert1
.esa1
.et1a
.ete1
.et1h
.eti1
.etj1
.etm1
.ev1
.eva1
.evo1
.exe1
.ey1
.eyt1
.faf1
.fer1
.fet1
.ff1
.ffa1
.fi2
.fig1
.fin1
.fis1
.fk1i
.fon1
.fyr1
.gad1
.gat1
.gav1
.gaz1
.gá1s
.gb1e
.gb1j
.gel1
.gg1e
.gha1
.gi1
.gil1
.gjo1
.goe1
.gol1
.go1n
.gos1
.gre1
.gri1
.gum1
.hal1
.ham1
.har1
.hed1
.hel1
.het1
.hin1
.hit1
.ho1j
.hok1
.hon1
.ho1r
.hot1
.ht1e
.hur1
.hu2s
.hut1
.hvi1
.ib1
.id1
.id1a
.id1i
.iel1
.if1
.if1s
.ih1
.ii1e
.iin1
.ii1s
.ij1
.ijo1
.il1
.il1a
.il1i
.ill1
.im1
.in1a
.in1e
.inn1
.in1r
.int1
.io1
.iri1
.isb1
.ise1
.isj1
.ist1
.ite1
.iv1a
.iv1g
.iv1i
.ivt1
.iw1i
.iya1
.iz1
.ïek1
.ïh2
.ïv2
.ja1a
.jab1
.jad1
.jak1
.jam1
.jat1
.jav1
.jed1
.jeh1
.jel1
.jem1
.jin1
.jïe1
.jog1
.joh1
.jon1
.jos1
.jov1
.jr1
.juk1
.jv1
.jve1
.jåa1
.ka2
.kad1
.kal1
.kee1
.kel1
.kem1
.ken2
.kep1
.ker1
.ket1
.kg1
.kid1
.kim1
.kir1
.kis1
.kks1
.kni1
.koh1
.kol1
.kor1
.ko1s1
.kul1
.kum1
.kup1
.ku1s
.kut1
.kuv1
.kyl1
.laa1
.lad1
.lak1
.la2r
.las1
.lat1
.lav1
.lee1
.lej1
.let1
.lf2
.li2
.lib1
.lid1
.lif1
.lig1
.lil1
.lim1
.lin1
.lis1
.lit1
.lïe1
.lka1
.lla2
.lm1
.lnr1
.lof1
.log1
.lok1
.lon1
.lor1
.lot1
.lov1
.lti1
.ltu1
.lul1
.lü1
.lvo1
.lx1
.lyö1
.lå1t
.mad1
.mak1
.mam1
.mas1
.mat1
.máj1
.mb1
.mbi1
.mb1j
.med1
.mej1
.met1
.mi2
.mib1
.mid1
.mij1
.mil1
.mim1
.min1
.mi1t
.mk1
.mk1i
.ml1
.ml1i
.ml1s
.mme1
.mo2
.mot1
.mp1
.mp1i
.mt1
.mwe1
.mæ2
.mæl1
.möt1
.måå1
.nab1
.naf1
.nal1
.nas1
.nat1
.nav1
.nár1
.ned1
.neg1
.neh1
.nej1
.nel1
.net1
.ng2
.nid1
.nie1
.nin1
.nj1i
.njå1
.nk2
.nmu1
.no2
.noe1
.noh1
.no2r1
.nos1
.np1a
.np1i
.nr2f
.nsb1
.nsi1
.nu1j2
.nul1
.num1
.nve1
.nän1
.oa1r
.oa1s
.ob1a
.od1a
.od1i
.odo1
.oe1
.oed1
.of1
.og1
.og1a
.oh1
.oh1t
.oks1
.olm1
.om1
.omi1
.on1a1
.ori1
.or1k1
.or2r
.ort1
.os1
.os2a
.os1e1
.os2s
.ost1
.ot2
.oth1
.ot1i
.ot1j2
.ott1
.out1
.ov1
.ovd1
.ovn1
.pb1
.ped1
.pem1
.per1
.pet1
.ph2
.pig1
.pij1
.pir1
.pis1
.pol1
.pom1
.pos1
.po1t
.pst1
.put1
.pyr1
.påe1
.rab1
.rad1
.raf1
.rak1
.rda1
.rdm1
.reb1
.red1
.reh1
.rej1
.rem1
.ret1
.rev1
.rg1
.rid1
.rig1
.rij1
.ril1
.rim1
.rin1
.rof1
.rog1
.ros1
.roš1
.rs1
.rta1
.rul1
.rv1
.ryn1
.ræf1
.råå1
.sa2
.sab1
.sad1
.sal1
.san1
.sat1
.sav1
.sbo1
.sd1e
.se2
.sea1
.sed1
.sef1
.sem1
.set1
.sho1
.sid1
.sij1
.sj2
.sje1
.sjo1
.sl1i
.sme1
.smi1
.smö1
.små1
.sof1
.sog1
.sos1
.sr1j
.st2
.ste1
.sti1
.svo1
.sys1
.sæv1
.så1g
.šjo1
.ta1
.tab1
.tac1
.ta2l1
.tat1
.te2
.tee1
.tel1
.tem1
.th2
.ti2
.tib1
.tif1
.tig1
.tih1
.tij1
.til1
.tim1
.tin1
.tjo1
.tn1
.tor1
.tov1
.tra1
.trä1
.tsa1
.tt1
.tu2
.tum1
.tuv1
.tve1
.tza1
.tze1
.ub1
.uc1
.ue1
.ug1
.uk1
.ulm1
.und1
.un2n1
.uo1
.up1
.ura1
.uro1
.us1a
.usb1
.us1j
.ust1
.ut1
.uts1
.utt1
.vad1
.vak1
.val1
.va1n1
.vaz1
.vd1i
.ve1
.veh1
.vel1
.vet1
.vev1
.vi1
.vid1
.vij1
.vin1
.vir1
.vis1
.vit1
.vk1
.vog1
.von1
.war1
.wa2s
.wek1
.wet1
.wri1
.wur1
.xia1
.xla1
.ydi1
.yh1
.yli1
.yri1
.ys1
.zab1
.zá1
.zid1
.æge1
.æj1
.äi1
.øi1
.ørn1
.øst1
.öl2
.ål1
.åne1
.årj1
.års1
.åse1
.åst1
.åår1
a2a
aa2a1
1aab1
aabe1
1aad.
aa2da
1aade
1aadh
1aadi
1aadj
1aadm
aa2du
aa2dy
aa2dæ
aafe1
1aah
aaho1
aa2i
1aaj
1aajh
aala1
aalh1
1aalk
aama1
1aamh
aamt1
1aanh
1aani
1aap1
aara1
aarh1
a1arm
aa2s
1aase1
1aash
1aasi
aas1j
1aasy
aati1
aa2v1
aave1
1aavh
aavi1
a1aw2
aawg1
1a2á1
1a1bb
1abba1
1abc
ab1d
abde1
abea1
1abem
a2b1es
a2b2f
a2bh
abi1
ab1j2g
abjs1
1ab1k
abla1
ablo1
1abm
2abp
abpa1
a2b1r
abra1
1ab1s
a2bt
abæ1
abø1
ac1as
a1cc1
a2ces
ach1
acha1
ache1
achi1
a2ci
acia1
aci1t
1acj
acj1g
acka1
1acko
a1cl
1acn
ac1s
1act
1acti
acu1
ac1z
1ac´
a1č
a1ç
2ad
1ad.
adad1
a2dam
adat1
adde1
1add´
a1de
ad1ee
adeh1
1a2dg
1ad1h
adha1
adhd1
a1di
a2die
adim1
adi1s
ad1j1
adje1
adj1g
adle1
1adm
admi1
1ad2n
adna1
adne1
ado2
adó1
a2dp
1adr
ad2re
1ad2s
ad1st
2adt
1a2d1v
1adz
1ad´
a2đ
ađa1
1ađg
a2e
a1ea1
1a1eb1
1aec1
ae2ci
aecj1
aed1
a1ee1
1aeen
aege1
1aegn
1aeh2
aeht1
1ae2j1
aejv1
aell1
1aelm
ael1t
2aem
aeme1
a2en
aep1
1aepa
1aerh
aer1n
1aerp
1a2es
1aesa1
1aese
1aesi
1aesj
1aesk
a1eu
aev1
aeva1
1aevj
a1é
2a1f
a2f1as
af1f
affi1
afi1
a2fid
a2fin
afj1g
a2fo
a2fp
afp1j
a2fr
afro1
1a2fs
af1sa
afsj1
af1st
2ag
agaa1
agan1
a1gb
a1gd
age1
a2ges
agg1a
a2gid
ag1j2
agj1g
agko1
a2gl
agli1
ag2n
a1go
agoh1
agov1
a1gp
a2gr
agra1
agre1
agro1
a2g2s
agst1
a1gu1
a2gw
a2gå
2ah1
aha2
ahan1
ahas1
ahat1
a1hb
a2he
ahe1r
a1hi
ah2j
ahje1
ahka1
ahki1
ahle1
ahm1
ahn1
aho1
ahpo1
ahve1
a2hö
a2hå
a1i
1a2i2a
aic1
aid1
aida1
1aid1s
a2ie1
a2i2i
a2ij2
aik1
1ail
aile1
aina1
ain1e
1ainj
1ainu1
1air
a2i1s
ai2sa
aitu1
ai2x1
a2i'
a2i`
a2i´
a1ï
a1í
aj1
a1ja
a1je
a1jh
ajht1
a1ji
a2jl
ajle1
1ajmo
a2jp
a1jr
ajse1
ajta1
a1jö
2ak
aka1
ake1
1aker
a2kf
a1kg
akh1
ak2i
ak1in
akis1
a2kj
akj1g
akke1
ak2kl
a1km
ako1
1akp
ak1pi
a2kr
a2krh
akrj1
a2krs
1ak2s
akst1
1akt.
akta1
akte1
1akth
1aktr
akur1
ak1v
akvi1
akå1
a1l2a
alas1
alat1
2alá1
albo1
al1d
ale1
1alf
1alg
1alg.
1algh
alht1
a1li1
1alie1
a2lih1
alik1
alis1
a1lï
a2l1j
1alj.
alj1g
aljs1
alka1
all2
alla1
1alm
alma1
alo2
alog1
al1p
a2l1s
alse1
al2st
1altr
a2lu1
al2y1
a2l1æ
alæg1
1alæs
a2lä
a2lö
alå1
1al´
amaa1
amba1
am2br
a2m2c
ame1n
1ame1r
a1mg
1amhk
amht1
amij1
am1j1
am2k1
am1la
am1li
amlj1
amma1
ammi1
am2na1
amo2
1amoh
amos1
amov1
amp1
am1s
1amt
amæ1
an2as
anat1
a2ná
an1b
1anc
anco1
and1l
1andr
an2e
an1ef
an1es
a2ng1
anga1
1ange
angh1
ang2l
ango1
ang1s
1angt
an2h2
anha1
anht1
1anhy
a2nie
anij1
anj2
a2nje
an1j1g
a2njo
a2nk
anmu1
an1n
anni1
anno1
a1no
anof1
1anog
ano1s
anó1
an2ph
an1r2
a2ns
anse1
ansj1
1ansn
a2nt
1antr
1a1n1u
a2nv
anvi1
a2nä
a2nö
1an'
1a2ŋ
a1o
ao2a
1a2of
aoh1
ao2i
aor1
1aos
a2o1t
aote1
aó1
a1ô
2a1p
apaa1
apas1
apá1
a2p1b
apba1
ap1es
aph1
a2p1i1
1apj1
apke1
a2pl
1apn
apo1
1apos
ap2p
ap2pe
1appr
a2pr
apre1
1apræ
ap1s
1apsi
apt1
apul1
aput1
apä1
ap1ö
1ap`
1ap´m
2a2q2
aqi1
aque1
aqvæ1
ar2a
arad1
1araj
ar1as
1arat
a2rá
1arbb
1arct
1ardd
are2
ar1ed
a2rel
arem1
a2rep
1arez
ar1f
ar1g
1argo
1ari.
1arid
ari1h1
arij1
1arin1
aris1
a2riz
arïe1
arj1g
ar1k
arke1
1arki
1arkt
a2rm
armk1
1arms
ar1n
arna1
ar2ne
1arni
ar2no
a2r1o
1aroi
1aros
arph1
a1r2pi
ar2q
arre1
ars2
arse1
arså1
arta1
ar2to
arts1
a2ru1
aruk1
a2ry
ar1å
1ar´
as2
1as.
a1sa
asá1
as2b2
2ase
a2sev
2a1sf
asfe1
a2sg
asg1j1
1ashf
asi1
1asi.
a1sï
1así
asj2
1asj.
1asjd
1asj1g
asjk1
a2sk
aska1
a2sl
asle1
a1sln
as2m
1asm.
a1sma1
asmæ1
2a2sn
1asne
a1s2o1
as2p1
aspi1
as1r
a1s2sa1
assi1
assj1
1asso
1asst
1assu1
2a2s1t
asti1
a2su
a2s1v
1asvi
asvo1
asæ1
asåå1
1as'
1as`
1as´n
1ašg
1ašk
aš1m
a2š1o
a1t
1at.
ata1
ata1d
atal1
atá1
a2tc
1atč
1atee
ate1n
at1e1s
1at1h1
at1id
at1in
1atir
at1ï
atje1
atj1g
1at2l
at1m
at2n1
1atnb
1atom
atov1
atre1
atri1
a2ts1
at2t1
atta1
atto1
1attr
attø1
a2tu1
atur1
a2t1v
a2tw
a2tå1
1at`
a1þ
a1u1
a2ua
1au1b
1a2ue
aue1s
1auf1
1aug
au2i
a2uk1
aul1
a2um
aup1
aure1
1a2us
ausb1
ause1
aust1
1au2t1
a1v
a2va1n1
av1as1
1avd1
aver1
avet1
a2vh1
avht1
av1id
avie1
avij1
avïe1
avj1
avjs1
avma1
1av2n
avnn1
avoe1
av1s
1avse
1avt
1avte
1avž
avå1
1av'
a1w
a2wa1
awd1
awe1
1aw1g
a2w1i
awj1g
awor1
1a2x
axa1
axe1
1axm
2a1y2
ayar1
ayr1
a1ys
a1z
aza1r
a2zá
a1ze
azl1
1azt
a2zü
a1ž
a1æ
a1ä
a1ö
a2å
aåb1
1aål
aåme1
1aån
1aåne
1aås
a2'
a2`
a2´
a1°
á1a2
áag1
áak1
áant1
áap1
á1á
ááhk1
á1b1
ábár1
ábbe1
áb2d
áb2f
áb2l
1ábm
ábo1
áb2r
ábud1
á2c2
ácia1
ác1l
á1č
á1ç
1ádá
ádde1
ád1j
ádja1
ádjo1
1ádo1
ád2r
ádus1
ád2ö
á1đ
á1e2
áeb1
áef1
áer1
áex1
áf1
á2fa
áffa1
áffe1
á1fi
áfj1
á1g2
ága1
ága1e
áge1
ágel1
á2gg
ág2l
á2gr
á2h
áh1c
áhce1
áhi1
áh2j
1áhk
1áhko1
áhku1
1áhkå
1áhpa
1áhpi
áht1
áhto1
2á1i1
áib1
áic1
áid1
áida1
áih1
áil1
áin1
áir1
áiva1
ái2w
á1j
1ája
ája1l
ája1m
á2jd
áje1s
á2j2g
ájïe1
ájje1
1ájl
áj1s
1ájt
ájä1
ákka2
ákki1
1ákŋ
ákse1
ákt1
ák2ö
1ál
ál2d
álda1
á1l1i
á1lj1
áljs1
álla1
álm1
álpe1
ál1sn
álve1
á2lö
ám1
áma1
ámbe1
ámet1
1ámm
1ámme
ám2n
ámt1
ámus1
á2mö
á2n1
1ánd1
ánda1
ándi1
áne1
ánej1
án2m
ánne1
1áno1
án2s
ánt1
1ánti
ánu1
án2å
1áŋ
1áŋk
1áŋŋ
á1o2
áob1
áod1
áolm1
áor1
áotj1
áout1
áó1
2á1p
áph1
á2pm
ápol1
áppe1
ápu1
2á2r
ára1
ára1s1
árá1
ár1d1
áre1
áret1
árje1
ár1n
árpe1
árt1
á2s1
á2sj
ásku1
1ásl
á1so
ásp1
ást1
ásta1
1áste
ász1
á2sä
2á2š
áša1
áš2nj
át2
áta1
á1te
áti1
á1tj1
átn1
átnj1
átor1
á1t1s2
1átt
áttá1
átte1
1átti
á1u2
áug1
ául1
áup1
2áv
á1va
áv1de
áv1di
ávd1j1
á1ve
ávef1
ávg1
ávh1
á2vi1
2ávj
áv2l
ávle1
ávn1
ávos1
áv1s
ávtt1
ávve1
á1w
á1x
á1z
áä2
áø2
áåe1
áån1
áåå1
âd2
âe2
âed1
âf2
âffa1
âgsm1
âhi1
âi2
âjr1
âl2
âlbd1
ân2
âo2
âr2
âs2
ât2
âvo1
âvu2
âvuk1
âæ2
ã1o
à1a2
à1b
à1c
à1č
à1d
à1f
1à1g
à1h
à1i
àj1
àku1
à1l2
à1m
ào2
à1p
1à1r
àro2
àron1
1àsi1
à2sn
à2s1t
à1t2
à1u
à1v
à1x
1b2a
b2aa
baar1
bab2
bac1
bact1
ba2d1
bada1
bade1
bae1n
ba1g
ba1h
ba1j2g
ba1k1
ba1l
balh1
ba1m2
bamb1
ban1
ba2nj
bant1
bao1
bap1
bar1
ba2ra
barh1
bari1
bart1
baru1
baræ1
barå1
bas1
bav1
baw1
1b2á
bád1
báh1
bák1
báv1
2b2b2
1bb.
bba1c
bba1r
bbc1i
bbcj2
bbe1s
bbi1
1bbl
bble1
bbl1i
bbo1
bbse1
1bb'
1bb´
2bc
b2ces
b2c1in
bcj1
bc2r
bcs1
b1č
2bd
b1dd
b2df
bdi1
bd1j2
bd1s
bdu2
1b2e
be1a
bea1l
bec1
becc1
beer1
bef1
beht1
bei1
bej2
be1k
bel2
bene1
be2r1
bert1
bes2i
be1st
2b1eu
be1v
b2é
b1f2
1bfd
bfj1
1bfr.
1b2fs
2b1g
bgæs1
2b2h2
bh1a1
bhjs2
bhor1
bhu1
1b2i
bia1
bib1
bi1c
bid1
biet1
bigu1
bih1
b1i2i
bij1
bijh1
bijo1
bik1
bila1
bile1
bil1h
bill1
bim1
b2in
b2ine
bi2n1i
2bip
birj1
bis1
bisj1
b2it
b1iw
1b2ï
b1ïe
bïer1
bïk1
bïr1
bïs2
b1í
2bj2
b1ja
b1je
bjeh1
b1ji
b2jï
bjoe1
bj2s
bju1
bjuk1
bjur1
b2jy
b2jæ1
b2jä
2b2k2
bk1a
bk1j2
bkon1
bks1
2b1l2
bla1n1
b2lea
b2lej
b1li1
bl1id
blin1
blis1
bloe1
blo1t
b1ls
bly1
b2læ1
2b1m2
b2ma1
bmá1
bmáj1
1bmb
bme2
bmej1
bmel1
b2mes
2bmh
b2mib
bmin1
bmj1
bmo2t1
b2mu1
b2mw
2b1n2
bna1
bne1
b2nes
bni1
bnij1
bnja1
b2nm
b2nn
b2no1
bnoe1
bnor1
bnp1
bnp1e
bnr1
b2ns
b2nu
1b2o
bob1
boe1k
bof1
bo1g
boh1
bol1
bolj2
bo1m1
bond1
bor1g
borh1
bo1s1
bo1t1
botn1
bott1
bov1
box1
boxe1
b1o2y
2b2ó1
b2ô1
2b1p2
1bp.
bpan1
1bpas1
bpek1
b2pf
bpij1
bp1j
bpo1b
bp1å
1bp'
br2
2bra1
b2ras
1brd1
brd1j
2bre1
1bree
brid1
brij1
brim1
1bro1
brok1
brs1
1b2ru
1brü
1bry1
1brz
1b2rø
1b2rå1
bråå1
2bs2
bsa1
1bsd
bse1
bse1n
bsfo1
b2si
bsjs2
b1sl
b1sn
bso1
bss1i
b1st2
bsta1
bste1
1bsti
1bstn
b2str
1bst'
1bst´
b1sv
b1sy
b1š2
2b2t2
bt1a
bti1
btie1
bt1j
btjs2
bto1
bts2
1b2u
buf1
bu2g1
buj2g
b1uk1
bulm1
bunæ1
bu2p1
bur1
bura1
burh1
buv1
2b2ü
b1v
bve1
bver1
bvi1
2b1w2
bwe1
b1x
1b2y1
bye1n
b1yk
byn1
byr1
byst1
2byö
byöt1
b1z2
2bž
1b2æ
bæ1r1
bæs1
bæv1
1b2ä2
1b2ø1
bøhn1
bøk1
bøl1
1b2ö
bööl1
böö1s
bööt1
1b2å2
2båd
båe1
båel1
bået1
bår1
bård1
bårj1
båte1
båvh1
2båå
2b2'
2b2`
2b2´
2b1°
1c2a
caa1
caas1
cab1
cac1
c1ae
caer1
caga1
2cak
cal2l
camb1
can1
cand1
cane1
cap1
cape1
car1
c2as1
ca2t1
cate1
cati1
2c2á
c1à
2cb2
cbav1
c1br
2c1c
1cc.
ccan1
cc1es
cc2h
c2ci1
1ccit
ccj2
ccle1
ccra1
ccre1
ccs1
ccu1
2c1č
c1ç
2c2d2
c2da
c1db
c1di
cdjs2
1c2e
cea1n
ce1k
cel1
c2em
ceni1
cent1
2ceo
cer1
cern1
cevn1
2c1é
2c1f
cfo1
cfö1
2c2g2
cgjs2
cgo1
cgó1
2c1h2
cha1
char1
chat1
c2há
c2hb
cher1
che1s
c2h1f
chle1
ch2m
c2h1o1
chom1
chon1
ch1sa
c2hu1
chu1g
chy1
chæ1
1c2i
c2id
cih1
cij1
cin1
cir1
ci2s1
cit2
cita1
citt1
civi1
c1ï
c1í
cízü1
1c2î
2c2j
cj2s1
2c1k
cka1
cka1h
cker1
ckie1
ckij1
ckin1
cko1
ckor1
c2kp
ck2s2
cku1
ckvi1
c2kæ
c2kä
2c2l
claa1
1clac
clai1
cl1c
cl1h
c1li2
clo1
clu1
cly1
c1lö
2c2m1
cma1
cm2d
cm2e
cmin1
cm2n
cmov1
2c1n2
2cn.
2c1ng
1cnn1
1c2o
2co.
cob1
cock1
c1od
cog1
coha1
co1j
coj2g
colo1
co1m1
con2
cone1
co2q
c1o1r1
cout1
